Wisconsin, session 2025, AB237.
do enact as follows:AB237,11Section 1. 48.195 (1m) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB237,2,7248.195 (1m) (a) (intro.) In addition to being taken into custody under s. 48.19, 3a child whom a law enforcement officer, emergency medical services practitioner, or 4hospital staff member reasonably believes to be 72 hours 30 days old or younger 5may be taken into custody under circumstances in which a parent of the child 6relinquishes custody of the child by any of the following methods and does not 7express an intent to return for the child:AB237,28Section 2. 48.355 (2d) (b) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:AB237,2,12948.355 (2d) (b) 5. That the parent has been found under s. 48.13 (2m) to have 10relinquished custody of the child under s. 48.195 (1m) when the child was 72 hours 1130 days old or younger, as evidenced by a final order of a court of competent 12jurisdiction making that finding.AB237,313Section 3. 48.415 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB237,2,171448.415 (1m) Relinquishment. Relinquishment, which shall be established 15by proving that a court of competent jurisdiction has found under s. 48.13 (2m) that 16the parent has relinquished custody of the child under s. 48.195 (1m) when the child 17was 72 hours 30 days old or younger.AB237,2,1818